Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [211B.125] PUBLICLY FUNDED ORGANIZATIONS; CAMPAIGN EXPENDITURES PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin An entity or organization, including any nonprofit organization, that receives state funding may not make a campaign expenditure or otherwise expend money for any political purpose. As used in this section, "state funding" includes receipt of public funds through a direct appropriation or a legislatively named, competitive, or other form of grant. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end